Alabama, session 2026rs, HB132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 13A-6-21, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§13A-6-21
(a) A person commits the crime of assault in the second
degree if the person does any of the following:
(1) With intent to cause serious physical injury to
another person, he or she causes serious physical injury to
any person.
(2) With intent to cause physical injury to another
person, he or she causes physical injury to any person by
means of a deadly weapon or a dangerous instrument.
(3) He or she recklessly causes serious physical injury
to another person by means of a deadly weapon or a dangerous
instrument.
(4)a. With intent to prevent a peace officer, as
defined in Section 36-21-60, a detention or correctional
officer at any municipal or county jail or state penitentiary,
emergency medical personnel, a utility worker, or a
firefighter from performing a lawful duty, he or she intends
to cause physical injury and he or she causes physical injury
to any person.
Page 1

to any person.
HB132 Enrolled
b. For the purpose of this subdivision, a person who is
a peace officer who is employed or under contract while off
duty by a private or public entity is a peace officer
performing a lawful duty when the person is working in his or
her approved uniform while off duty with the approval of his
or her employing law enforcement agency. Provided, however,
that nothing Nothing contained in this subdivision shall be
deemed or construed as amending, modifying, or extending the
classification of a peace officer as off-duty off duty for
workers' compensation purposes or any other benefits to which
a peace officer may otherwise be entitled to under law when
considered on-dutyon duty. Additionally, nothing contained in
this subdivision shall be deemed or construed as amending,
modifying, or extending the tort liability of any municipality
as a result of any action or inaction on the part of an
off-duty police officer.
(5) With intent to cause physical injury to a teacher
or to an employee of a public educational institution during
or as a result of the performance of his or her duty, he or
she causes physical injury to any person.
(6) With intent to cause physical injury to a health
care worker, including a nurse, physician, technician, or any
other person employed by or practicing at a hospital as
defined in Section 22-21-20; a county or district health
department; a long-term care facility; a physician's office,
clinic, or outpatient treatment facility during the course of
or as a result of the performance of the duties of the health
care worker or other person employed by or practicing at the
Page 2

care worker or other person employed by or practicing at the
HB132 Enrolled
hospital; the county or district health department; any health
care facility owned or operated by the State of Alabama; the
long-term care facility; the physician's office, clinic, or
outpatient treatment facility; or a pharmacist, pharmacy
technician, pharmacy intern, pharmacy extern, or pharmacy
cashier; he or she causes physical injury to any person. This
subdivision shall apply to assaults on home health care
workers while they are in a private residence. This
subdivision shall not apply to assaults by patients who are
impaired by medication.
(7) For a purpose other than lawful medical or
therapeutic treatment, he or she intentionally causes stupor,
unconsciousness, or other physical or mental impairment or
injury to another person by administering to him or her,
without his or her consent, a drug, substance, or preparation
capable of producing the intended harm.
(8) With intent to cause physical injury to a
Department of Human Resources employee or any employee
performing social work, as defined in Section 34-30-1, during
or as a result of the performance of his or her duty, he or
she causes physical injury to any person.
(9) With intent to cause physical injury to a letter
carrier, as defined in Section 32-6-380, during or as a result
of the performance of his or her duty, he or she causes
physical injury to any person.
(10) With intent to cause physical injury to a child,
as defined in Section 16-22A-3, located in an educational
environment, as defined in Section 16-22A-3, he or she: (i) is
Page 3

environment, as defined in Section 16-22A-3, he or she: (i) is
HB132 Enrolled
at least 19 years of age; (ii) is not employed by or enrolled
in the entity associated with the educational environment, as
defined in Section 16-22A-3; and (iii) causes physical injury
to any person.
(b) Assault in the second degree is a Class C felony.
(c) For the purposes of this section, "utility worker"
means any person who is employed by an entity that owns,
operates, leases, or controls any plant, property, or facility
for the generation, transmission, manufacture, production,
supply, distribution, sale, storage, conveyance, delivery, or
furnishing to or for the public of electricity, natural or
manufactured gas, water, steam, sewage, or telephone service,
including two or more utilities rendering joint service."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4

1, 2026.
HB132 Enrolled
100
101
102
103
104
105
106
107
108
109 ________________________________________________
110 Speaker of the House of Representatives
111
112
113
114 ________________________________________________
115 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
116
117
118 House of Representatives
119
120 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
121 was passed by the House 24-Feb-26, as amended.
122
123 John Treadwell
124 Clerk
125
126
127
128
129
130 Senate 01-Apr-26 Passed
131
132
133
Page 5